test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NID_VINIT_iiyaw_gt-norm.yaml
     #Isolation form
     iiyaw: iiyaw
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     +Px1iiyaw: niiiyaw
     +Px2iiyaw: giiiyaw
     +Px3iiyaw: oiiyaw
     +PxIndefiiyaw: iiiyaw
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     iiyaw+Con: iiyawenh
     iiyaw+Dim: iiyawens
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3
     iiyaw+Pos: iiyawim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     iiyaw+Pej: iiyawish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5
     iiyaw+Pos1Pl: iiyawinaan
     iiyaw+PosObv: iiyawini
     iiyaw+PosPl: iiyawiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     iiyaw+Pret: iiyawiban
     iiyaw+VocPl: iiyaw***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     iiyaw+Loc: iiyawing
     iiyaw+Obv: iiyawan
     iiyaw+Pl: iiyawag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     +Px1iiyaw+Con: niiiyawenh
     +Px1iiyaw+Dim: niiiyawens
     +Px2iiyaw+Con: giiiyawenh
     +Px2iiyaw+Dim: giiiyawens
     +Px3iiyaw+Con: oiiyawenh
     +Px3iiyaw+Dim: oiiyawens
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Con: iiiyawenh
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Dim: iiiyawens
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     +Px1iiyaw+Pos: niiiyawim
     +Px2iiyaw+Pos: giiiyawim
     +Px3iiyaw+Pos: oiiyawim
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Pos: iiiyawim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     +Px1iiyaw+Pej: niiiyawish
     +Px2iiyaw+Pej: giiiyawish
     +Px3iiyaw+Pej: oiiyawish
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Pej: iiiyawish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     +Px1iiyaw+Pos1Pl: niiiyawinaan
     +Px1iiyaw+PosObv: niiiyawini
     +Px1iiyaw+PosPl: niiiyawiwaa
     +Px2iiyaw+Pos1Pl: giiiyawinaan
     +Px2iiyaw+PosObv: giiiyawini
     +Px2iiyaw+PosPl: giiiyawiwaa
     +Px3iiyaw+Pos1Pl: oiiyawinaan
     +Px3iiyaw+PosObv: oiiyawini
     +Px3iiyaw+PosPl: oiiyawiwaa
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Pos1Pl: iiiyawinaan
     +PxIndefiiyaw+PosObv: iiiyawini
     +PxIndefiiyaw+PosPl: iiiyawiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     +Px1iiyaw+Pret: niiiyawiban
     +Px1iiyaw+VocPl: niiiyaw***idig, idog***
     +Px2iiyaw+Pret: giiiyawiban
     +Px2iiyaw+VocPl: giiiyaw***idig, idog***
     +Px3iiyaw+Pret: oiiyawiban
     +Px3iiyaw+VocPl: oiiyaw***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Pret: iiiyawiban
     +PxIndefiiyaw+VocPl: iiiyaw***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     +Px1iiyaw+Loc: niiiyawing
     +Px1iiyaw+Obv: niiiyawan
     +Px1iiyaw+Pl: niiiyawag
     +Px2iiyaw+Loc: giiiyawing
     +Px2iiyaw+Obv: giiiyawan
     +Px2iiyaw+Pl: giiiyawag
     +Px3iiyaw+Loc: oiiyawing
     +Px3iiyaw+Obv: oiiyawan
     +Px3iiyaw+Pl: oiiyawag
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Loc: iiiyawing
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Obv: iiiyawan
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Pl: iiiyawag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     iiyaw+Con+Pos: iiyawenhim
     iiyaw+Dim+Pos: iiyawensim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     iiyaw+Con+Pej: iiyawenhish
     iiyaw+Dim+Pej: iiyawensish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5
     iiyaw+Con+Pos1Pl: iiyawenhinaan
     iiyaw+Con+PosObv: iiyawenhini
     iiyaw+Con+PosPl: iiyawenhiwaa
     iiyaw+Dim+Pos1Pl: iiyawensinaan
     iiyaw+Dim+PosObv: iiyawensini
     iiyaw+Dim+PosPl: iiyawensiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     iiyaw+Con+Pret: iiyawenhiban
     iiyaw+Con+VocPl: iiyawenh***idig, idog***
     iiyaw+Dim+Pret: iiyawensiban
     iiyaw+Dim+VocPl: iiyawens***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     iiyaw+Con+Loc: iiyawenhing
     iiyaw+Con+Obv: iiyawenhan
     iiyaw+Con+Pl: iiyawenhag
     iiyaw+Dim+Loc: iiyawensing
     iiyaw+Dim+Obv: iiyawensan
     iiyaw+Dim+Pl: iiyawensag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4
     iiyaw+Pos+Pej: iiyawimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5
     iiyaw+Pos+Pos1Pl: iiyawiminaan
     iiyaw+Pos+PosObv: iiyawimini
     iiyaw+Pos+PosPl: iiyawimiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 6
     iiyaw+Pos+Pret: iiyawimiban
     iiyaw+Pos+VocPl: iiyawim***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 7
     iiyaw+Pos+Loc: iiyawiming
     iiyaw+Pos+Obv: iiyawiman
     iiyaw+Pos+Pl: iiyawimag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 5
     iiyaw+Pej+Pos1Pl: iiyawishinaan
     iiyaw+Pej+PosObv: iiyawishini
     iiyaw+Pej+PosPl: iiyawishiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     iiyaw+Pej+Pret: iiyawishiban
     iiyaw+Pej+VocPl: iiyawish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     iiyaw+Pej+Loc: iiyawishing
     iiyaw+Pej+Obv: iiyawishan
     iiyaw+Pej+Pl: iiyawishag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5, 6
     iiyaw+Pos1Pl+Pret: iiyawinaaniban
     iiyaw+Pos1Pl+VocPl: iiyawinaan***idig, idog***
     iiyaw+PosObv+Pret: iiyawiniiban
     iiyaw+PosObv+VocPl: iiyawini***idig, idog***
     iiyaw+PosPl+Pret: iiyawiwaaiban
     iiyaw+PosPl+VocPl: iiyawiwaa***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5, 7
     iiyaw+Pos1Pl+Loc: iiyawinaaning
     iiyaw+Pos1Pl+Obv: iiyawinaanan
     iiyaw+Pos1Pl+Pl: iiyawinaanag
     iiyaw+PosObv+Loc: iiyawiniing
     iiyaw+PosObv+Obv: iiyawinian
     iiyaw+PosObv+Pl: iiyawiniag
     iiyaw+PosPl+Loc: iiyawiwaaing
     iiyaw+PosPl+Obv: iiyawiwaaan
     iiyaw+PosPl+Pl: iiyawiwaaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     iiyaw+Pret+Loc: iiyawibaning
     iiyaw+Pret+Obv: iiyawibanan
     iiyaw+Pret+Pl: iiyawibanag
     iiyaw+VocPl+Loc: iiyaw***idig, idog***ing
     iiyaw+VocPl+Obv: iiyaw***idig, idog***an
     iiyaw+VocPl+Pl: iiyaw***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     +Px1iiyaw+Con+Pos: niiiyawenhim
     +Px1iiyaw+Dim+Pos: niiiyawensim
     +Px2iiyaw+Con+Pos: giiiyawenhim
     +Px2iiyaw+Dim+Pos: giiiyawensim
     +Px3iiyaw+Con+Pos: oiiyawenhim
     +Px3iiyaw+Dim+Pos: oiiyawensim
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Con+Pos: iiiyawenhim
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Dim+Pos: iiiyawensim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     +Px1iiyaw+Con+Pej: niiiyawenhish
     +Px1iiyaw+Dim+Pej: niiiyawensish
     +Px2iiyaw+Con+Pej: giiiyawenhish
     +Px2iiyaw+Dim+Pej: giiiyawensish
     +Px3iiyaw+Con+Pej: oiiyawenhish
     +Px3iiyaw+Dim+Pej: oiiyawensish
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Con+Pej: iiiyawenhish
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Dim+Pej: iiiyawensish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     +Px1iiyaw+Con+Pos1Pl: niiiyawenhinaan
     +Px1iiyaw+Con+PosObv: niiiyawenhini
     +Px1iiyaw+Con+PosPl: niiiyawenhiwaa
     +Px1iiyaw+Dim+Pos1Pl: niiiyawensinaan
     +Px1iiyaw+Dim+PosObv: niiiyawensini
     +Px1iiyaw+Dim+PosPl: niiiyawensiwaa
     +Px2iiyaw+Con+Pos1Pl: giiiyawenhinaan
     +Px2iiyaw+Con+PosObv: giiiyawenhini
     +Px2iiyaw+Con+PosPl: giiiyawenhiwaa
     +Px2iiyaw+Dim+Pos1Pl: giiiyawensinaan
     +Px2iiyaw+Dim+PosObv: giiiyawensini
     +Px2iiyaw+Dim+PosPl: giiiyawensiwaa
     +Px3iiyaw+Con+Pos1Pl: oiiyawenhinaan
     +Px3iiyaw+Con+PosObv: oiiyawenhini
     +Px3iiyaw+Con+PosPl: oiiyawenhiwaa
     +Px3iiyaw+Dim+Pos1Pl: oiiyawensinaan
     +Px3iiyaw+Dim+PosObv: oiiyawensini
     +Px3iiyaw+Dim+PosPl: oiiyawensiwaa
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Con+Pos1Pl: iiiyawenhinaan
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Con+PosObv: iiiyawenhini
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Con+PosPl: iiiyawenhiwaa
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Dim+Pos1Pl: iiiyawensinaan
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Dim+PosObv: iiiyawensini
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Dim+PosPl: iiiyawensiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     +Px1iiyaw+Con+Pret: niiiyawenhiban
     +Px1iiyaw+Con+VocPl: niiiyawenh***idig, idog***
     +Px1iiyaw+Dim+Pret: niiiyawensiban
     +Px1iiyaw+Dim+VocPl: niiiyawens***idig, idog***
     +Px2iiyaw+Con+Pret: giiiyawenhiban
     +Px2iiyaw+Con+VocPl: giiiyawenh***idig, idog***
     +Px2iiyaw+Dim+Pret: giiiyawensiban
     +Px2iiyaw+Dim+VocPl: giiiyawens***idig, idog***
     +Px3iiyaw+Con+Pret: oiiyawenhiban
     +Px3iiyaw+Con+VocPl: oiiyawenh***idig, idog***
     +Px3iiyaw+Dim+Pret: oiiyawensiban
     +Px3iiyaw+Dim+VocPl: oiiyawens***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Con+Pret: iiiyawenhiban
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Con+VocPl: iiiyawenh***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Dim+Pret: iiiyawensiban
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Dim+VocPl: iiiyawens***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     +Px1iiyaw+Con+Loc: niiiyawenhing
     +Px1iiyaw+Con+Obv: niiiyawenhan
     +Px1iiyaw+Con+Pl: niiiyawenhag
     +Px1iiyaw+Dim+Loc: niiiyawensing
     +Px1iiyaw+Dim+Obv: niiiyawensan
     +Px1iiyaw+Dim+Pl: niiiyawensag
     +Px2iiyaw+Con+Loc: giiiyawenhing
     +Px2iiyaw+Con+Obv: giiiyawenhan
     +Px2iiyaw+Con+Pl: giiiyawenhag
     +Px2iiyaw+Dim+Loc: giiiyawensing
     +Px2iiyaw+Dim+Obv: giiiyawensan
     +Px2iiyaw+Dim+Pl: giiiyawensag
     +Px3iiyaw+Con+Loc: oiiyawenhing
     +Px3iiyaw+Con+Obv: oiiyawenhan
     +Px3iiyaw+Con+Pl: oiiyawenhag
     +Px3iiyaw+Dim+Loc: oiiyawensing
     +Px3iiyaw+Dim+Obv: oiiyawensan
     +Px3iiyaw+Dim+Pl: oiiyawensag
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Con+Loc: iiiyawenhing
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Con+Obv: iiiyawenhan
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Con+Pl: iiiyawenhag
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Dim+Loc: iiiyawensing
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Dim+Obv: iiiyawensan
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Dim+Pl: iiiyawensag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     +Px1iiyaw+Pos+Pej: niiiyawimish
     +Px2iiyaw+Pos+Pej: giiiyawimish
     +Px3iiyaw+Pos+Pej: oiiyawimish
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Pos+Pej: iiiyawimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     +Px1iiyaw+Pos+Pos1Pl: niiiyawiminaan
     +Px1iiyaw+Pos+PosObv: niiiyawimini
     +Px1iiyaw+Pos+PosPl: niiiyawimiwaa
     +Px2iiyaw+Pos+Pos1Pl: giiiyawiminaan
     +Px2iiyaw+Pos+PosObv: giiiyawimini
     +Px2iiyaw+Pos+PosPl: giiiyawimiwaa
     +Px3iiyaw+Pos+Pos1Pl: oiiyawiminaan
     +Px3iiyaw+Pos+PosObv: oiiyawimini
     +Px3iiyaw+Pos+PosPl: oiiyawimiwaa
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Pos+Pos1Pl: iiiyawiminaan
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Pos+PosObv: iiiyawimini
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Pos+PosPl: iiiyawimiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6
     +Px1iiyaw+Pos+Pret: niiiyawimiban
     +Px1iiyaw+Pos+VocPl: niiiyawim***idig, idog***
     +Px2iiyaw+Pos+Pret: giiiyawimiban
     +Px2iiyaw+Pos+VocPl: giiiyawim***idig, idog***
     +Px3iiyaw+Pos+Pret: oiiyawimiban
     +Px3iiyaw+Pos+VocPl: oiiyawim***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Pos+Pret: iiiyawimiban
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Pos+VocPl: iiiyawim***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 7
     +Px1iiyaw+Pos+Loc: niiiyawiming
     +Px1iiyaw+Pos+Obv: niiiyawiman
     +Px1iiyaw+Pos+Pl: niiiyawimag
     +Px2iiyaw+Pos+Loc: giiiyawiming
     +Px2iiyaw+Pos+Obv: giiiyawiman
     +Px2iiyaw+Pos+Pl: giiiyawimag
     +Px3iiyaw+Pos+Loc: oiiyawiming
     +Px3iiyaw+Pos+Obv: oiiyawiman
     +Px3iiyaw+Pos+Pl: oiiyawimag
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Pos+Loc: iiiyawiming
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Pos+Obv: iiiyawiman
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Pos+Pl: iiiyawimag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5
     +Px1iiyaw+Pej+Pos1Pl: niiiyawishinaan
     +Px1iiyaw+Pej+PosObv: niiiyawishini
     +Px1iiyaw+Pej+PosPl: niiiyawishiwaa
     +Px2iiyaw+Pej+Pos1Pl: giiiyawishinaan
     +Px2iiyaw+Pej+PosObv: giiiyawishini
     +Px2iiyaw+Pej+PosPl: giiiyawishiwaa
     +Px3iiyaw+Pej+Pos1Pl: oiiyawishinaan
     +Px3iiyaw+Pej+PosObv: oiiyawishini
     +Px3iiyaw+Pej+PosPl: oiiyawishiwaa
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Pej+Pos1Pl: iiiyawishinaan
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Pej+PosObv: iiiyawishini
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Pej+PosPl: iiiyawishiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6
     +Px1iiyaw+Pej+Pret: niiiyawishiban
     +Px1iiyaw+Pej+VocPl: niiiyawish***idig, idog***
     +Px2iiyaw+Pej+Pret: giiiyawishiban
     +Px2iiyaw+Pej+VocPl: giiiyawish***idig, idog***
     +Px3iiyaw+Pej+Pret: oiiyawishiban
     +Px3iiyaw+Pej+VocPl: oiiyawish***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Pej+Pret: iiiyawishiban
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Pej+VocPl: iiiyawish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 7
     +Px1iiyaw+Pej+Loc: niiiyawishing
     +Px1iiyaw+Pej+Obv: niiiyawishan
     +Px1iiyaw+Pej+Pl: niiiyawishag
     +Px2iiyaw+Pej+Loc: giiiyawishing
     +Px2iiyaw+Pej+Obv: giiiyawishan
     +Px2iiyaw+Pej+Pl: giiiyawishag
     +Px3iiyaw+Pej+Loc: oiiyawishing
     +Px3iiyaw+Pej+Obv: oiiyawishan
     +Px3iiyaw+Pej+Pl: oiiyawishag
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Pej+Loc: iiiyawishing
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Pej+Obv: iiiyawishan
